de: Rübensorte: Avalanche-Bete; Mini-Bete; Chioggia-Rübe; Zylinderbete; Gelbe Bete; Regenbogenbete; Rote Bete; Zuckerrübe; Weiße Bete; Sonstige
ja: ビールの種類: アバランチビート; ベビービート; キオッジャビート; シリンドラビート; ゴールデンビート; レインボービート; レッドビート; シュガービート; ホワイトビート; その他
pt-PT: Variedade de beterraba: Beterraba avalanche; Beterraba baby; Beterraba chioggia; Beterraba cylindra; Beterraba dourada; Beterraba arco-íris; Beterraba vermelha; Beterraba-sacarina; Beterraba branca; Outro
da: Bedevariant: Avalanche-bede; Babybede; Chioggia-bede; Cylindra-bede; Gylden bede; Regnbuebede; Rødbede; Sukkerroe; Hvid bede; Anden
pl: Odmiana buraka: Burak Avalanche; Mini buraki; Burak Chioggia; Burak Cylindra; Złoty burak; Tęczowy burak; Burak ćwikłowy; Burak cukrowy; Biały burak; Inne
sk-SK: Odroda repy: Repa Avalanche; Baby repa; Repa Chioggia; Repa Cylindra; Zlatá repa; Dúhová repa; Červená repa; Cukrová repa; Biela repa; Iné
tr: Pancar çeşidi: Avalanche pancarı; Bebek pancar; Chioggia pancarı; Cylindra pancarı; Altın pancar; Gökkuşağı pancarı; Kırmızı pancar; Şeker pancarı; Beyaz pancar; Diğer
zh-CN: 甜菜品种: 雪崩甜菜; 迷你甜菜; 基奥贾甜菜; 圆柱甜菜; 金甜菜; 彩虹甜菜; 红甜菜; 糖用甜菜; 白甜菜; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta repe: Pesa avalanche; Mlada pesa; Pesa chioggia; Pesa cylindra; Rumena pesa; Mavrična pesa; Rdeča pesa; Sladkorna pesa; Bela pesa; Drugo
nl: Bietenvariant: Avalanche-biet; Babybiet; Chioggia-biet; Cylindra-biet; Gouden biet; Regenboogbiet; Rode biet; Suikerbiet; Witte biet; Overige
en: Beet variety: Avalanche beet; Baby beet; Chioggia beet; Cylindra beet; Golden beet; Rainbow beet; Red beet; Sugar beet; White beet; Other
vi: Loại củ dền: Củ dền trắng Avalanche; Củ dền bao tử; Củ dền Chioggia; Củ dền trụ; Củ dền vàng; Củ dền bảy sắc; Củ dền đỏ; Củ cải đường; Củ dền trắng; Khác
el: Ποικιλία παντζαριού: Τεύτλο Avalanche; Baby τεύτλο; Τεύτλο Chioggia; Τεύτλο Cylindra; Χρυσό τεύτλο; Τεύτλο Ουράνιο τόξο (Rainbow); Κόκκινο τεύτλο; Ζαχαρότευτλο; Λευκό τεύτλο; Άλλο
sv: Betsort: Avalanche-beta; Minibeta; Polkabeta; Cylindrabeta; Gulbeta; Regnbågsbeta; Rödbeta; Sockerbeta; Vitbeta; Övrigt
lt-LT: Burokėlių veislė: „Avalanche“ burokėliai; Jauni burokėliai; „Chioggia“ burokėliai; Cilindriniai burokėliai; Auksiniai burokėliai; Vaivorykštiniai burokėliai; Raudonieji burokėliai; Cukriniai runkeliai; Baltieji burokėliai; Kita
bg-BG: Сорт цвекло: Цвекло лавина; Бейби цвекло; Цвекло Киоджа; Цилиндрично цвекло; Златно цвекло; Цвекло дъга; Червено цвекло; Захарно цвекло; Бяло цвекло; Друго
zh-TW: 甜菜品種: 雪崩甜菜; 迷你甜菜; 基奧賈甜菜; 圓柱甜菜; 黃金甜菜; 彩虹甜菜; 紅甜菜; 甜菜根; 白甜菜; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta repe: Repa Avalanche; Mlada repa; Repa Chioggia; Cikla Cylindra; Zlatna cikla; Šarena cikla; Crvena cikla; Šećerna repa; Bijela cikla; Ostalo
th: พันธุ์บีทรูท: บีทรูทอวาแลนช์; เบบี้บีท; บีทรูทชิออจเจีย; บีทรูทซิลินดรา; บีทรูทสีทอง; บีทรูทสายรุ้ง; บีทรูทสีแดง; ชูการ์บีท; บีทรูทสีขาว; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Soiul de sfeclă: Sfeclă Avalanche; Sfeclă baby; Sfeclă Chioggia; Sfeclă Cylindra; Sfeclă aurie; Sfeclă curcubeu; Sfeclă roșie; Sfeclă de zahăr; Sfeclă albă; Altele
it: Varietà di barbabietola: Barbabietola avalanche; Barbabietola baby; Barbabietola di Chioggia; Barbabietola cylindra; Barbabietola dorata; Barbabietola arcobaleno; Barbabietola rossa; Barbabietola da zucchero; Barbabietola bianca; Altro
cs: Odrůda řepy: Řepa Avalanche; Baby řepa; Řepa Chioggia; Řepa Cylindra; Zlatá řepa; Duhová řepa; Červená řepa; Cukrová řepa; Bílá řepa; Jiné
es: Variedad de remolacha: Remolacha Avalanche; Remolacha baby; Remolacha Chioggia; Remolacha Cylindra; Remolacha dorada; Remolacha arcoíris; Remolacha roja; Remolacha azucarera; Remolacha blanca; Otro
hu: Cékla fajtája: Avalanche cékla; Bébícékla; Chioggia cékla; Cylindra cékla; Sárga cékla; Szivárványos cékla; Vörös cékla; Cukorrépa; Fehér cékla; Egyéb
ko: 비트 품종: 아발란체 비트; 미니 비트; 키오자 비트; 실린드라 비트; 골든 비트; 레인보우 비트; 레드 비트; 사탕무; 화이트 비트; 기타
ru: Сорт свеклы: Свёкла Аваланш; Молодая свёкла; Свёкла Кьоджа; Свёкла Цилиндра; Золотистая свёкла; Радужная свёкла; Красная свёкла; Сахарная свёкла; Белая свёкла; Другое
pt-BR: Variedade de beterraba: Beterraba avalanche; Minibeterraba; Beterraba chioggia; Beterraba cylindra; Beterraba dourada; Beterraba arco-íris; Beterraba vermelha; Beterraba sacarina; Beterraba branca; Outros
nb: Betevariant: Avalanche-bete; Babybete; Polkabete; Sylinderbete; Gulbete; Regnbuebete; Rødbete; Sukkerroe; Hvitbete; Annet
fi: Punajuurilajike: Avalanche-juurikas; Minijuurikas; Raitajuuri; Cylindra-punajuuri; Keltajuuri; Sateenkaarijuuri; Punajuuri; Sokerijuurikas; Valkojuurikas; Muu
fr: Variété de betterave: Betterave Avalanche; Mini-betterave; Betterave Chioggia; Betterave Cylindra; Betterave jaune; Betterave arc-en-ciel; Betterave rouge; Betterave sucrière; Betterave blanche; Autre